Washington statutes.
RCW 10.46.060

True name inserted in proceedings.

When a defendant is designated in the indictment or information by a fictitious or erroneous name, and in any stage of the proceedings his or her true name is discovered, it may be inserted in the subsequent proceedings, referring to the fact of his or her being indicted or informed against by the name mentioned in the indictment or information.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1044; 1891 c 28 s 23; Code 1881 s 1007; 1873 p 225 s 190; 1869 p 241 s 185; RRS s 2058.]

NOTES:

True name: RCW 10.40.050.